Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-1086
Plant pest, defined.

Plant pest shall mean any insect, arthropod, nematode, mollusk, fungus, bacteria, virus, mycoplasma, parasitic plant, physiological disorder, or other infectious agent which can directly or indirectly injure or cause damage or a pathological condition to plants.

Laws 1988, LB 874, § 15.